Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4820
Employer; grant of leaves of absence; encouraged.

An employer shall be encouraged to grant paid leaves of absence to an employee who seeks to undergo a medical procedure to donate bone marrow.

Laws 1992, LB 1099, § 2.